Utah statutes.
9-8-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Board of State History.
(2)  "Director" means the director of the Division of State History.
(3)  "Division" means the Division of State History.
(4)  "Documentary materials" means written or documentary information
contained in published materials, manuscript collections, archival materials,
photographs, sound recordings, motion pictures, and other written, visual, and
aural materials, except government records.
(5)  "Historical artifacts" means objects produced or shaped by human efforts,
a natural object deliberately selected and used by a human, an object of
aesthetic interest, and any human-made objects produced, used, or valued by
the historic peoples of Utah.
(6) (a)  "Pass-through funding" means funds appropriated by the Legislature to
a state agency that are intended to be passed through the state agency to:
(i)  local governments;
(ii)  other government agencies;
(iii)  private organizations, including not-for-profits; or
(iv)  persons in the form of a loan or grant.
(b)  The funding may be:
(i)  general funds, federal funds, dedicated credits, or any combination of
funding sources; and
(ii)  ongoing or one-time.
(7)  "Society" means the Utah State Historical Society.
